Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.540

911 account.

(1) The 911 account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the state 911 excise taxes imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account must be used to support the priorities established in RCW 38.52.545, procure, fund, and manage the statewide 911 emergency communications system network, purchase goods and services that support the counties and Washington state patrol public safety answering points in providing 911 baseline level of service statewide, assist the counties and Washington state patrol public safety answering points to provide 911 emergency communications systems and associated administrative and operational costs, acquire 911 hardware, software, and technology appropriate to support a 911 emergency communications system, 911 emergency communications training and public education, support the statewide coordination and management of the 911 emergency communications system, and for modernization needs as technology evolves of the 911 emergency communications systems statewide.

(2) Funds generated by the 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030 (5), (6), and (8) may not be distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county 911 excise tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030 (1) through (3).

(3) The state 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the 911 advisory committee, is authorized to enter into statewide agreements to improve the efficiency of the 911 emergency communications system and shall specify by rule the additional purposes for which moneys, if available, may be expended from this account.

[ 2022 c 203 s 14; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 949; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 966; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 915; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 18. Prior: 2002 c 371 s 905; 2002 c 341 s 4; 2001 c 128 s 2; 1998 c 304 s 14; 1994 c 96 s 7; 1991 c 54 s 6.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2012 2nd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 371: See notes following RCW 9.46.100.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 341: See notes following RCW 38.52.501.

Findings—2001 c 128: "The legislature finds that the statewide emergency communications network of enhanced 911 telephone service, which allows an immediate display of a caller's identification and location, has served to further the safety, health, and welfare of the state's citizens, and has saved lives.

The legislature further finds that statewide operation and management of the enhanced 911 system will create efficiencies of operation and permit greater local control of county 911 operations, and further that some counties will continue to need assistance from the state to maintain minimum enhanced 911 service levels." [ 2001 c 128 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 128: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 128 s 4.]

Findings—Effective dates—1998 c 304: See notes following RCW 82.14B.020.

Finding—Intent—Effective dates—1994 c 96: See notes following RCW 82.14B.020.

Referral to electorate—1991 c 54: See note following RCW 38.52.030.